tests/morphophonology/negative.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] ambiguous back vowels (язарга)": 
     яз<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : язма
     яз<v><tv><neg><pres><p2><sg> : язмыйсың
     яз<v><tv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : язмый
     яз<v><tv><neg><pres><p1><pl> : язмыйбыз

  "[twol] ambiguous back vowels (җыенырга)": 
     җыен<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : җыенма
     җыен<v><tv><neg><pres><p2><sg> : җыенмыйсың
     җыен<v><tv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : җыенмый
     җыен<v><tv><neg><pres><p1><pl> : җыенмыйбыз
     
  "[twol] unambiguous back vowels (басарга)": 
     бас<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : басма
     бас<v><tv><neg><pres><p2><sg> : басмыйсың
     бас<v><tv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : басмый
     бас<v><tv><neg><pres><p1><pl> : басмыйбыз

  "[twol] front vowels (белергә)": 
     бел<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : белмә
     бел<v><tv><neg><pres><p2><sg> : белмисең
     бел<v><tv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : белми
     бел<v><tv><neg><pres><p1><pl> : белмибез
